Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 5. Licensing of Public Weighmasters and Dealers and Service Persons of Weights and Measure Devices

§ 2721.
Licensed public weighmaster—license.

Any person who is 18 years of age or older wishing to be a licensed public weighmaster shall apply to the Secretary upon forms provided by the Agency and remit a fee of $25.00. Upon approval, the Secretary shall issue to the applicant a license certificate that shall expire on June 30 unless sooner suspended or revoked under section 2723 of this title. Renewal applications shall be in such form as the Secretary shall prescribe.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 41, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1969, No. 9

, § 2;

1971, No. 69

, § 11, eff. April 15, 1971;

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 21, 2002;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 2722.
Optional licensing.

The following persons shall not be required, but shall be permitted, to obtain licenses as licensed public weighmasters: (1) law enforcement officers when acting within the scope of their official duties, (2) a person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles that he or his employer, if any, is either buying or selling, and (3) a person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles in conformity with the requirements of federal statutes or the statutes of this State relative to warehousepersons or processors.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 48, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2723.
Suspension and revocation of license.

The Secretary may suspend or revoke the license of any licensed public weighmaster:

when he or she is satisfied, after a hearing upon 20 days’ notice to the licensee, that the licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter of the Secretary affecting licensed public weighmaster; or

when a licensed weighmaster has been convicted in any court of violating any law relating to weights and measures.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 50, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 7.

§ 2724.
Prohibited acts.

No person may assume the title licensed public weighmaster, or any title of similar import, perform the duties or acts to be performed by a licensed public weighmaster under this chapter, hold himself or herself out as a licensed public weighmaster, issue any weight certificate, ticket, memorandum, or statement for which a fee is charged, or engage in the full-time or part-time business of public weighing, unless he or she holds a valid license as a licensed public weighmaster.
“Public weighing,” as used in this section, means the weighing for any person, upon request, of property, produce, commodities, or articles other than those which the weigher or his or her employer, if any, is either buying or selling.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 49, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2725.
Dealers and service persons of weighing and measuring devices; registration certificate; hand seal.

Any person wishing to be registered as a dealer or service person shall apply to the Secretary upon forms provided by the Agency, and each application shall be accompanied by a fee of $60.00. Upon approval, the Secretary shall issue to the applicant a registration certificate that shall expire on June 30 unless sooner suspended or revoked under section 2726 of this title. Any service person who applies for a registration certificate must have obtained a hand seal that has a number registered with the Secretary. Any service person who has been granted a registration certificate shall, with the hand seal, seal all meters with a lead and wire seal at the time as he or she installs, repairs, or adjusts the meters.

Any person who installs bulk milk tanks for remuneration or as a term of the sale of such tank shall be registered as a dealer of weighing and measuring devices, prior to the installation of the tank. Such person shall follow the procedure set forth in subsection (a) of this section in applying for the registration certificate and shall comply with all applicable laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 54, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 12, eff. April 15, 1971;

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

1983, No. 57

;

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. June 21, 2002;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 2726.
Suspension or revocation of certificate.

The Secretary may suspend or revoke the certificate of any registered dealer or service person when he or she is satisfied after a hearing, upon 20 days’ notice to the registrant, that the registrant has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule issued pursuant to this chapter, or when a person licensed pursuant to this section has been convicted by a court of violating any law relating to weights and measures.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 58, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7.

§ 2727.
Placed in service report.

The Secretary shall furnish each registered dealer and service person with a supply of report forms to be known as “placed in service reports.” Such a form shall be executed in triplicate, shall include the assigned registration number, and shall be signed by a registered dealer or service person after making a repair, adjustment, or the sale and installation of a new, repaired, rebuilt, exchanged, or used weighing or measuring device. Within 48 hours after a device is restored to service, or placed in service, the original of the properly executed placed in service report, together with any official rejection tag removed from the device, shall be mailed to the Secretary, Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets agriculture building, Montpelier, Vermont. The duplicate copy of the report shall be handed to the owner or operator of the device, and the triplicate copy of the report shall be retained by the registered dealer or service person.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 55, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2728.
Disposition of condemned devices.

A dealer or service person who accepts weighing or measuring devices, which have been condemned by the Secretary or inspector, in trade for new or used weighing or measuring devices, and which are intended to be dismantled or destroyed, upon receipt thereof, shall remove the condemned tags. The condemned tags shall be returned to the Secretary within 10 days thereafter, with a statement describing the weighing or measuring device, giving the number of the weighing or measuring device, if obtainable, and the name and address of the former owner or user from which it was received. There shall also be furnished a statement of what disposition has been made of the weighing or measuring device.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 56, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2729.
Calibration of testing equipment; certificate.

A dealer or service person shall submit his or her testing equipment at least once every year to the office of the Secretary for comparison and calibration with the standard maintained by the Secretary. After comparison and calibration, the Secretary shall issue to the dealer or service person a certificate of his or her findings.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 57, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2730.
Licensing for operation of weighing and measuring devices.

As used in this section:

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Capacity” means, for a scale, the heaviest specified load that can be applied to the load-receiving element of the scale, as rated by the manufacturer.

“Hopper scale” means a weighing device designed for weighing bulk commodities whose load-receiving element is a tank, box, or hopper mounted on a weighing element.

“Motor fuel dispenser meter” means a device designed for the measurement and delivery of liquids used as fuel for internal combustion engines.

“Scale” means any weighing device used in commercial trade and not otherwise covered by this chapter.

“Meter” means any measuring device used in commercial trade which measures vapor, liquid, elapsed time, or distance.

“Vehicle tank meter” means a measuring device that is affixed to a tank mounted on a vehicle used for the measurement and delivery of petroleum products, except liquified petroleum gas.

“Vehicle scales” mean scales adapted to weighing highway, farm, or other large industrial vehicles, except railroad freight cars, loaded or unloaded.

“Heavy duty scale” means a device with rated capacity in excess of 3,000 pounds.

“Propane meter” means a device used to measure liquified petroleum gas.

“Bulk plant meter” means a device used to measure fluid or gas moving from storage tanks to tanks mounted on vehicles.

“Commercial” means the exchange or buying and selling of goods, commodities, or services for profit or fee.

“Medium duty scale” means a device with rated capacity between 100 and 3,000 pounds.

“Electric vehicle supply equipment” and “electric vehicle supply equipment available to the public” have the same meanings as in

30 V.S.A. § 201

.

No person shall operate a commercial weighing and measuring device without first obtaining a license from the Secretary. Any person operating commercial weighing and measuring devices at more than one location, or in more than one motor vehicle, shall obtain a separate license for each location or vehicle.

Any person wishing to obtain a license to operate a weighing or measuring device shall annually apply to the Secretary, on forms provided by the Secretary, on or before January 1. Each application shall be accompanied by a fee as specified in this section. Except for new applicants, any applicant who applies for a license after January 1 shall pay a late fee as provided for under

6 V.S.A. § 1(a)(13)

.

The Secretary may suspend, revoke, or deny a license application if the licensee, or applicant, has violated any provision of this chapter. The Secretary may require reapplication and payment of appropriate fees whenever excessive inspections are required to ensure the credibility of a commercial device. A person in violation of this section shall be subject to penalty under subchapter 7 of this chapter.

The Secretary shall not issue a weighing and measuring device license unless:

the device to be operated has been inspected and approved by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Market’s consumer assurance section within 12 months of the date of application; and

the applicant furnishes all information required by the Secretary.

The Secretary shall charge, per unit, the following annual license fees:
(f) (1) The Secretary shall charge, per unit, the following annual license fees:

Retail motor fuel dispenser meter: $25.00.

Vehicle tank meter: $125.00.

Scales: $10.00.

Vehicle and heavy duty scales: $175.00.

[Repealed.]

Meter: $25.00.

[Repealed.]

Truck mounted propane meter: $175.00.

Hopper scales: $125.00.

Propane fill station: $60.00.

Medium duty scales:

When the Agency incurs expenses when conducting a licensing procedure greater than those normally incurred, the Agency shall assess and retain a service charge sufficient to recoup its additional expenses.

[Repealed.]

The Secretary may waive the license fee for medium duty scales for commercial enterprises that operate the scales primarily as a public service.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 19; amended

1991, No. 31

, §§ 2-4, eff. Jan. 1, 1992;

1991, No. 80

, §§ 2-4;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1993, No. 74

, §§ 7, 7a;

1995, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7;

1999, No. 49

, § 129;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. June 21, 2002;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2013, No. 72

, § 21;

2013, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(g), eff. July 1, 2016;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2017, No. 74

, § 15;

2017, No. 75

, § 6;

2019, No. 59

, § 32.